da: Oliestyringsfunktioner i bundkar: Med ledeplader; Integreret krumtapskraber; Magnetisk aftapningsprop; Ikke relevant/ingen; Oliereturpassager; Klargjort til oliestandssensor; Klargjort til turboladerens olieretur; Ledeplade i bundkar; Klapventiler; Integreret skvulpeplade; Andet
pt-PT: Características do deflector/proteção contra turbulência do cárter de óleo: Com defletor; Raspador do cárter integrado; Bujão de drenagem magnético; Não aplicável/nenhum; Passagens de retorno de óleo; Provisão para sensor de nível de óleo; Provisão para retorno de óleo do turbo; Placa defletora de cárter; Portas basculantes; Bandeja defletora integrada; Outro
ro-RO: Caracteristici de protecție/aerisire a băii de ulei: Cu șicane; Răzuitor de arbore cotit integrat; Bușon de golire magnetic; Inaplicabil/fără; Canale de retur al uleiului; Pregătire pentru senzor de nivel al uleiului; Pregătire pentru retur ulei turbo; Placă de șicană pentru baie; Clapete; Tavă deflectoare integrată; Altele
zh-CN: 油底壳挡板/挡风功能: 带挡板; 集成曲轴刮油板; 磁性放油塞; 不适用/无; 回油道; 预留机油液位传感器接口; 预留涡轮增压器回油接口; 油底壳挡板; 挡油活门; 集成挡油板; 其他
es: Características del deflector/control de aceite del cárter: Con deflectores; Rascador de cigüeñal integrado; Tapón de drenaje magnético; No aplicable/ninguno; Pasajes de retorno de aceite; Provisión para sensor de nivel de aceite; Provisión para retorno de aceite de turbo; Placa deflectora de cárter; Puertas trampa; Bandeja deflectora integrada; Otro
zh-TW: 油底殼擋板/擋油特色: 具擋板; 整合曲軸刮油板; 磁性洩油螺絲; 不適用/無; 回油通道; 預留機油液位感測器孔位; 預留渦輪回油孔位; 油底殼擋板; 活板門; 整合導油盤; 其他
de: Merkmale des Ölwannen-Schwallblechs/Windabweisers: Mit Schwallblech; Integrierter Kurbelwellenabstreifer; Magnetische Ablassschraube; Nicht zutreffend/keine; Ölrücklaufkanäle; Vorbereitung für Ölstandssensor; Vorbereitung für Turbo-Ölrücklauf; Sumpfschwallblech; Klappen; Integrierter Ölhobel; Andere
hr-HR: Značajke pregrade/zaštite od vjetra u karteru: S pregradama; Ugrađen strugač radilice; Magnetski čep za ispuštanje; Nije primjenjivo / Nema; Prolazi za povrat ulja; Predviđeno mjesto za senzor razine ulja; Predviđeno mjesto za povrat turbo ulja; Pregradna ploča korita; Zaporna vratašca; Integrirana plitica protiv raspršivanja ulja; Ostalo
sv: Oljetrågsbaffel-/vindskyddsfunktioner: Skvalpskott; Integrerad vevaxelskrapa; Magnetisk avtappningsplugg; Ej tillämpligt/ingen; Oljereturkanaler; Förberedd för oljenivåsensor; Förberedd för turbooljeretur; Skvalpplåt för oljetråg; Klaffar; Integrerad skvalpplåt; Övrigt
pt-BR: Cárter de óleo recursos de defletor/controle de agitação: Com defletor; Raspador de cárter integrado; Bujão de drenagem magnético; Não aplicável/nenhum; Passagens de retorno de óleo; Provisão para sensor de nível de óleo; Provisão para retorno de óleo do turbo; Placa defletora do cárter; Portinholas; Bandeja defletora de óleo integrada; Outro
ru: Особенности перегородок и ветрозащиты масляного поддона: С перегородками; Встроенный маслосъемник коленвала; Магнитная сливная пробка; Неприменимо / нет; Масловозвратные каналы; Гнездо для датчика уровня масла; Гнездо для возврата масла от турбины; Перегородка поддона; Заслонки; Встроенная маслоуспокоительная пластина; Другое
sk-SK: Vlastnosti prepážky olejovej vane a vetrolamu: S prepážkou; Integrovaná stierka kľukového hriadeľa; Magnetická vypúšťacia zátka; Nehodí sa/žiadne; Kanály na vrátenie oleja; Príprava na snímač hladiny oleja; Príprava na vrátenie oleja z turba; Prepážka olejovej vane; Záklopky; Integrovaný rozrážač oleja; Iné
en: Oil pan baffle/windage features: Baffled; Crank scraper integrated; Magnetic drain plug; Not applicable/none; Oil return passages; Provision for oil level sensor; Provision for turbo oil return; Sump baffle plate; Trap doors; Windage tray integrated; Other
fi: Öljypohjan väliseinä-/windage-suojaratkaisut: Loiskelevyllinen; Integroitu kampiakselin kaavin; Magneettinen tyhjennystulppa; Ei sovellu / ei mitään; Öljyn paluukanavat; Valmius öljyntasoanturille; Valmius turbon öljynpaluulle; Pohjan loiskelevy; Läppäventtiilit; Integroitu kampikammion loiskelevy; Muu
ko: 오일 팬 배플/윈디지 기능: 배플; 크랭크 스크레이퍼 통합형; 자석 드레인 플러그; 해당 없음/없음; 오일 리턴 통로; 오일 레벨 센서용 프로비전; 터보 오일 리턴용 프로비전; 섬프 배플 플레이트; 트랩 도어; 윈디지 트레이 통합형; 기타
cs: Vlastnosti přepážky/ochrany proti větru pro olejovou vanu: S přepážkami; Integrovaná stěrka klikového hřídele; Magnetický vypouštěcí šroub; Nelze použít / žádné; Kanálky pro návrat oleje; Příprava pro senzor hladiny oleje; Příprava pro návrat oleje z turba; Přepážka olejové vany; Klapky; Integrovaný deflektor oleje; Ostatní
vi: Các tính năng chắn gió/vách ngăn dầu trong chảo dầu: Có vách ngăn; Tích hợp gạt trục khuỷu; Ốc xả nhớt có nam châm; Không áp dụng/Không có; Đường hồi dầu; Vị trí lắp cảm biến mức dầu; Vị trí hồi dầu turbo; Tấm vách ngăn các-te; Cửa bẫy; Tích hợp khay cản gió; Khác
ja: オイルパンのバッフル／風防機能: バッフル付き; クランクスクレーパー一体型; マグネットドレンプラグ; 該当なし/なし; オイルリターンパッセージ; オイルレベルセンサー機能付き; ターボオイルリターン対応; サンプバッフルプレート; トラップドア; ウィンデージトレイ内蔵; その他
th: คุณสมบัติแผ่นกั้น/กันน้ำมันในอ่างน้ำมันเครื่อง: มีแผ่นกั้น; มีตัวขูดเพลาข้อเหวี่ยงในตัว; ปลั๊กถ่ายน้ำมันเครื่องแบบแม่เหล็ก; ไม่มี/ไม่เกี่ยวข้อง; ช่องทางไหลกลับน้ำมัน; รองรับเซ็นเซอร์ระดับน้ำมัน; รองรับการไหลกลับน้ำมันของเทอร์โบ; แผ่นกั้นอ่างน้ำมัน; ประตูกั้นน้ำมัน (Trap doors); ถาดกันน้ำมันกระเพื่อมในตัว; อื่นๆ
hu: Olajteknő terelőjének/szélfogójának jellemzői: Terelőlemezes; Beépített olajlehúzó; Mágneses leeresztő csavar; Nem alkalmazható / nincs; Olajvisszafolyó csatornák; Előkészítés olajszint-érzékelőhöz; Előkészítés turbó olajvisszafolyáshoz; Olajteknő terelőlemez; Csapóajtók; Beépített olajhabzásgátló; Egyéb
sl-SI: Lastnosti pregrad/zaščite pred pljuskanjem v oljni kadi: S pregradami; Vgrajen strgalnik ročične gredi; Magnetni čep za izpust; Ni primerno/brez; Kanali za povratek olja; Predpriprava za senzor nivoja olja; Predpriprava za povratek olja iz turbopolnilnika; Pregradna plošča zbiralnika; Enosmerne lopute; Vgrajena zaščita proti penjenju (windage tray); Drugo
it: Caratteristiche del deflettore/paraschiuma della coppa dell'olio: Con paratie; Raschiaolio albero motore integrato; Tappo di scarico magnetico; Non applicabile/nessuno; Passaggi di ritorno dell'olio; Predisposizione per sensore di livello dell'olio; Predisposizione per il ritorno dell'olio del turbo; Piastra paratia della coppa; Sportelli a ribalta; Paratia antisbattimento integrata; Altro
pl: Elementy przegrody/osłony miski olejowej: Z przegrodami; Zintegrowany zgarniacz oleju; Magnetyczny korek spustowy; Nie dotyczy / brak; Kanały spływu oleju; Miejsce na czujnik poziomu oleju; Miejsce na spływ oleju z turbosprężarki; Płyta przegradzająca miskę olejową; Klapki zwrotne; Zintegrowana taca olejowa; Inne
el: Χαρακτηριστικά του διαφράγματος/του συστήματος μείωσης της τριβής του κάρτερ λαδιού: Με διαφράγματα; Ενσωματωμένη ξύστρα στροφάλου; Μαγνητική τάπα αποστράγγισης; Δεν ισχύει/κανένα; Δίοδοι επιστροφής λαδιού; Πρόβλεψη για αισθητήρα στάθμης λαδιού; Πρόβλεψη για επιστροφή λαδιού turbo; Πλάκα διαφράγματος κάρτερ; Καταπακτές; Ενσωματωμένος δίσκος αποστράγγισης; Άλλο
nl: Oliecarter baffle-/windage-kenmerken: Met keerschot; Geïntegreerde krukasschraper; Magnetische aftapplug; Niet van toepassing/geen; Olieretourkanalen; Voorziening voor oliepeilsensor; Voorziening voor turbo-olieretour; Carterkeerschot; Valdeurtjes; Geïntegreerde olieslingerplaat; Overig
nb: Skvalpeskott-/windage-funksjoner i bunnpanne: Med skvalpeskott; Integrert veivskrape; Magnetisk tappeplugg; Ikke relevant / ingen; Oljereturkanaler; Klargjort for oljenivåsensor; Klargjort for turbooljeretur; Skvalpeplate for bunnpanne; Klaffventiler; Integrert vindplate; Annet
bg-BG: Характеристики на преградите/ветроотвеждането на масления картер: С прегради; Интегриран стъргач на коляновия вал; Магнитна пробка за източване; Не е приложимо/няма; Канали за връщане на маслото; Място за сензор за ниво на маслото; Място за връщане на турбо масло; Преградна плоча на картера; Възвратни клапани; Интегрирана тава против разпенване; Друго
tr: Yağ karteri baffle/rüzgâr kırıcı özellikleri: Bölmeli; Krank sıyırıcı entegre; Manyetik tahliye tapası; Geçerli değil/yok; Yağ dönüş kanalları; Yağ seviye sensörü yuvası; Turbo yağ dönüş yuvası; Karter bölme plakası; Dalgakıran kapakları; Çalkalanma önleyici sac entegre; Diğer
fr: Chicanes et dispositifs anti-barbotage du carter d’huile: Cloisonné; Racleur de vilebrequin intégré; Bouchon de vidange magnétique; Sans objet/aucun; Passages de retour d'huile; Emplacement pour capteur de niveau d'huile; Emplacement pour retour d'huile de turbo; Plaque de cloisonnement de carter; Clapets; Tôle anti-émulsion intégrée; Autre
lt-LT: Alyvos karterio pertvarų / vėjo nukreipimo savybės: Su pertvaromis; Integruotas alkūninio veleno grandiklis; Magnetinis išleidimo kamštis; Netaikoma / nėra; Alyvos grįžtamieji kanalai; Numatyta vieta alyvos lygio jutikliui; Numatyta vieta turbinos alyvos grįžtamajam srautui; Karterio pertvaros plokštė; Uždarymo sklendės; Integruotas apsauginis padėklas nuo taškymosi; Kita